Illinois, session 104th, HB4533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Money Transmission Modernization 5Act is amended by adding Section 12-5 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 658/12-5 new)7    Sec. 12-5. Donations; Illinois DREAM Fund.8    (a) Licensees may offer every customer who transmits money 9internationally the option to make a voluntary donation to the 10Illinois DREAM Fund. Licensees may present customers with the 11option to make a donation to the Illinois DREAM Fund before the 12customer completes the transaction. The amount of the donation 13shall be no less than $1 per transaction. The Department may 14adopt rules to administer, implement, and interpret the 15provisions of this Section, including, but not limited to, the 16amount of the donation options to be presented to customers, 17the manner and timing of receiving donations and remitting the 18donations to the Illinois DREAM Fund, and the methods by which 19the licensee may offer the option to donate to customers. 20Licensees shall not use, deduct, or retain any amounts from 21donations to the Illinois DREAM Fund, except any actual cost 22imposed by third-party payment processors to receive or remit 23the funds.   HB4533 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16567 BAB 29965 b1    (b) The Department shall provide to licensees under this 2Act electronic copies of all marketing materials created by 3the Illinois DREAM Fund Commission for licensees pursuant to 4subsection (e) of Section 67 of the Higher Education Student 5Assistance Act.